California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission or each alternate member serving in place of a member, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive a sum not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This per diem shall be paid to members for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission. Members shall also receive the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77267.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77268.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any producer, handler, or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of the commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof. Liability is several and not joint, and no member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [77281. - 77299.]

77281.

The powers and duties of the commission include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77282.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77283.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77284.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77285.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the control of the commission. If the person engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. In the event that the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77286.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77287.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77288.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77289.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all producers and handlers, a copy of which shall also be submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77290.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77291.

The commission may make, in its name, contracts to receive or render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and any other contracts or agreements that the commission may deem necessary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77292.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, production research, including the study, analysis, accumulation, and dissemination of information obtained from the research or elsewhere, regarding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77293.

The commission may accept contributions or match private, state, or federal funds, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies, for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77294.

The commission may publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information to producers and handlers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77295.

The commission shall establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77296.

The commission shall establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 77286.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77297.

The commission shall submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77298.

The commission and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required in a judicial proceeding, all lists of producers and handlers in their possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77299.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [77311. - 77320.]

77311.

(a) Within 30 days of the effective date of this chapter, the secretary shall have established a list of producers and handlers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary may require that producers, handlers, and others submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers and handlers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of peppers produced by each producer and the quantity of peppers handled by each handler, or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 77312. The request for the information shall be in writing and shall be filed within 10 days following receipt of the request.

(b) Any producer or handler whose name does not appear upon the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer or handler. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from paying assessments and does not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this article.

(c) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers and handlers on the lists in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary so long as all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77312.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds as follows in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary:

(a) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article have participated and that either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article, have participated, and that either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77313.

The secretary shall use fresh weight in calculating the volume voted pursuant to Section 77312. For converting dry weight and seed weight to fresh equivalent weight the secretary shall use the following ratios: 5.3 to 1 for dry weight and 220 to 1 for seed weight.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77314.

The secretary shall establish a period in that to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures that may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period, however, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.91.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77315.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77316.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 77312, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected producers and handlers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.92.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77317.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 77312, the secretary shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The director may conduct another implementation referendum vote one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.93.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77318.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall do the following:

(a) Contact all producers in each district by mail or call meetings of producers in each district for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. All producers on the secretary’s list shall be given written notice of any election meetings at least 10 days prior to the meeting date. To be eligible for election to the commission, producer nominees must present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least three eligible producers from the district from which the nominee is seeking election.

(b) Contact all handlers by mail or by calling a meeting for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. All handlers on the secretary’s list shall be given written notice of any election meetings at least 10 days prior to the meeting date. To be eligible for election to the commission, handler nominees must present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least two eligible handlers who are engaged in the same type of handler activity as the handler seeking nomination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.94.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77319.

Subsequent to the first election of members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures that are established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.95.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77320.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to Section 77312, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out Section 77312 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon establishment of the commission, the commission is authorized to reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out Section 77312 and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.96.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [77331. - 77338.]

77331.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the following marketing year not later than March 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as is possible.

(b) The assessment for the 1989–90 marketing year shall not exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per ton for producers and twenty-five cents ($0.25) per ton for handlers on all peppers grown and shipped on a wet pound or ton basis by producers and handled by handlers. Thereafter, the assessment shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per ton for producers and one dollar ($1) per ton for handlers.

(c) The assessment for the 1989–90 marketing year shall not exceed $0.00065 per pound for producers and $0.00065 per pound for handlers on all peppers grown and shipped on a dry pound basis by producers and handled by handlers. Thereafter, the assessment shall not exceed a maximum of $0.0026 per pound for producers and $0.0026 per pound for handlers.

(d) The assessment for the 1989–90 marketing year shall not exceed two cents ($0.02) per pound for producers and two cents ($0.02) per pound for handlers on all planting seed grown by producers and handled by handlers. Thereafter, the assessment shall not exceed a maximum of eight cents ($0.08) per pound for producers and eight cents ($0.08) per pound for handlers.

(e) The handler shall deduct the producer assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer and shall be a trustee of these funds and the assessment owed by the handler until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(f) A fee greater than the amount provided in this section may not be charged unless and until a greater fee is approved pursuant to the procedures specified in Section 77312.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77332.

(a) Unless specified otherwise, this chapter does not apply to persons who grow peppers only for the producer’s home use or who grow or produce less than the number of acres or tons established pursuant to Section 77230 of fresh peppers, or the equivalent in dry peppers or pepper seed, in the current marketing year. However, any such person who markets peppers shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing that the person grows less than 10 acres of peppers or produces less than 100 tons of fresh peppers, or the equivalent in dry peppers or pepper seed. The commission shall then determine whether the affidavit should be approved.

(b) Unless specified otherwise, this chapter does not apply to any person who handles less than the number of tons of fresh peppers established pursuant to Section 77226, or the equivalent in dehydrated peppers or pepper seed, in the current marketing year. However, any person who is handling peppers shall file an affidavit with the commission specifying that the person handles less than the number of tons of peppers established pursuant to Section 77226. The commission shall, upon receipt of the affidavit, determine whether this chapter applies to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77333.

Every person who handles peppers in California, including persons who handle less than the tonnage threshold established pursuant to Section 77226, shall keep a complete and accurate record of all peppers handled with the name of the producer whose peppers were handled. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the handler for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77334.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the director from producers or handlers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Information on volume shipments, product value, and any other related information which is required for reports to governmental agencies; financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information; and any other information which the commission requires that gives only totals, but excludes individual producer and handler information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77335.

Any assessment which is levied as provided for in this chapter is a personal debt of every producer and handler so assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77336.

Every handler shall be personally liable for the payment of collected assessments to the commission. Failure of a handler to collect the assessment shall not exempt the handler from liability and shall not relieve any person subject to this chapter from the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77337.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, pay 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77338.

When the producer or handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including but not limited to, failing to pay assessments or to collect assessments, shall also include identical liability upon each director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [77351. - 77354.]

77351.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission. 

(c) When engaged in the handling of peppers, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the names and addresses of persons from whom peppers have been received and the quantity so received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77352.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the director shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77353.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for the obtaining for injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of that part, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding peppers until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable verdict for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77354.

Termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which has arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [77371. - 77376.]

77371.

Between May 1, 1993, and April 30, 1994, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers and handlers to determine whether the operations of this chapter shall be approved and continued in effect. A favorable vote under this chapter shall be found if the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible producers and handlers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations of this chapter. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain effective. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operations of this chapter suspended upon expiration of the marketing season ending April 30, 1994. Thereupon, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 77375. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77372.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to April 30, 1994, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to this article. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum following the procedures provided in Section 77371.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 527, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

77373.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the full commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing year.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with the director requesting a suspension signed by 20 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume of peppers in the immediately preceding marketing year, and 20 percent of the handlers by number who handled not less than 20 percent of the volume of peppers in the immediately preceding marketing year, hold a referendum among the producers and handlers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows, by the weight of evidence, that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend operation of this chapter if the director finds either one of the following has occurred:

(1) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director have participated in the referendum:

(A) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the director have participated in the referendum:

(A) Sixty-five percent or more of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of peppers in the preceding marketing year by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 212.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

77374.

(a) The secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the then current marketing year if the director finds that the termination of the commission is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that produce at least 51 percent of the total volume of peppers and at least 51 percent of the eligible handlers that handle at least 51 percent of the total volume of peppers.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures to the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall specify his or her place of business in a manner that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention to terminate. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77375.

After the effective date of suspension, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the prorated refund to these persons, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University system, another state agency, or a federal agency that deals with the purposes of this chapter. If an appropriate program does not exist, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 213.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

77376.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all persons affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17.5. California Strawberry Commission [77401. - 77500.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [77401. - 77407.]

77401.

The production and marketing of strawberries constitutes an important industry of this state that provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77402.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient creation and management of a research program to develop improved varieties of strawberries, an integrated approach to control pests and diseases common to strawberries, and more efficient cultural practices. The commission is also necessary for the efficient development and management of a national and international advertising and promotion program which, combined with the research program, will enhance the competitiveness of the California strawberry industry within the national and international marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77403.

The maintenance of the strawberry industry of California is necessary to assure the public of a continuous supply of this vital product and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the strawberry industry of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77404.

The production and marketing of strawberries produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with the public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77405.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, marketing research, and production research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77406.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with rules and regulations adopted under the chapter, shall be deemed a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77407.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of the particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [77410. - 77425.]

77410.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77411.

“Strawberries” mean all strawberries produced in California for commercial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

77412.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.
